Utah statutes.
11-42-603.   Sources of payment for interim warrants and bond anticipation notes.

Each local entity that has issued interim warrants or bond anticipation notes shall pay the warrants or notes from:

(1)  proceeds from the sale of assessment bonds;

(2)  cash the local entity receives from the payment for improvements;

(3)  assessments;

(4)  improvement revenues that are not pledged to the payment of assessment bonds;

(5)  proceeds from the sale of interim warrants or bond anticipation notes; or

(6)  the local entity's guaranty fund or, if applicable, the reserve fund.



Amended by Chapter 246, 2009 General Session

